Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6039.02
Paid dining assistant; permitted activities.

A paid dining assistant shall:

(1) Only feed residents who have no complicated feeding problems as selected by the nursing home based on the resident's latest assessment and plan of care and a determination by the charge nurse that the resident's condition at the time of such feeding meets that plan of care;

(2) Work under the supervision of a licensed registered or practical nurse who is in the nursing home and immediately available; and

(3) Call a supervisor for help in an emergency.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 116.